Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1067.
do enact as follows:SB1067,13Section 1. 946.412 of the statutes is created to read:SB1067,2,21946.412 Dissemination of personally identifying information of an 2officer. (1) In this section:SB1067,2,43(a) “Disseminate” means to electronically publish, post, or disclose to a public 4internet site or public forum.SB1067,2,85(b) “Officer” means a law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 165.85 (2) (c), a 6tribal law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 165.85 (2) (g), a correctional officer, 7as defined in s. 301.28 (1), a juvenile detention officer, as defined in s. 165.85 (2) 8(bt), or a federal agent or federal law enforcement officer operating in this state.SB1067,2,109(c) “Personally identifying information” means information that identifies or 10reasonably can be used to identify an individual.SB1067,2,1211(2) A person who knowingly disseminates the personally identifying 12information of an officer is guilty of a Class H felony if any of the following apply:SB1067,2,1413(a) The dissemination was made with the intent to intimidate, abuse, 14threaten, harass, or frighten the officer.SB1067,2,1615(b) The dissemination was made with the intent to obstruct or delay a 16criminal investigation, an enforcement operation, or another duty of the officer.SB1067,2,1717